District of Columbia statutes.
34-1313.04

Irrevocability of financing order.

A financing order is irrevocable and the Commission may not reduce, impair, or terminate the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Property approved in the financing order or impair the collection or recovery of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges or DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Revenue until the Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and the pertinent financing order have been paid in full.

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 304, 61 DCR 1882